New Jersey, session 221, A5724.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  As used in this section, standardized assessment means an assessment administered to all students in a specific grade level or subject area and whose results are aggregated for analysis at the district, school, or student subgroup level. b.    The Commissioner of Education shall receive approval from the State Board of Education for administration of a new standardized assessment that is not otherwise required by State or federal law, prior to imposing the requirement on public schools. Standardized assessment requirements that are in effect prior to the effective date of this act, but which are updated or revised to use a new version or form of an assessment, shall not be considered a new standardized assessment for purposes of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.